District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.22

Repealed

Deposit of security — Release from liability.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 127, ch. 222, § 22
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 955, Pub. L. 85-792, § 7
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-422.
1973 Ed., § 40-438.